South Dakota, session 2026, HB1108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 22-19A:
If the court dismisses a petition filed pursuant to § 22-19A-8 without a hearing
pursuant to § 22-19A-10, the clerk of court must immediately seal the petition and any
supporting documents in the case.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 22-19A:
If the court denies a petition filed pursuant to § 22-19A-8 after a hearing pursuant
to § 22-19A-10, the court must seal the case upon a finding on the record that the petition
was filed with no basis in fact or law and was harassing, frivolous, or abusive in nature.
The court shall notify law enforcement of any sealing order issued pursuant to this
section. Upon notification, law enforcement must make any record of the petition
nonpublic.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 25-10:
If the court dismisses a petition filed pursuant to § 25-10-3 without a hearing held
pursuant to § 25-10-4, the clerk of court must immediately seal the petition and any
supporting documents in the case.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 25-10:
If the court denies a petition filed pursuant to § 25-10-3 without a hearing held
pursuant to § 25-10-4, the court must seal the case upon a finding on the record that the

26.55.13 2 1108
petition was filed with no basis in fact or law and was harassing, frivolous, or abusive in
nature.
The court shall notify law enforcement of any sealing order issued pursuant to this
section. Upon notification, law enforcement must make any record of the petition
nonpublic.
Section 5. The Unified Judicial System shall apply the provisions of sections 1 and 3 of this
Act retroactively to all court records maintained electronically.
HB1108 ENROLLED

26.55.13 3 1108
An Act to require the sealing of court files upon dismissal or denial of a petition for a protection
order.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1108
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1108 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1108 ENROLLED